Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 8. Power of Eminent Domain Granted

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Eminent Domain §§ 17 to 53.

Zoning as a factor in determination of damages in eminent domain, 9 ALR3d 291.

Right to enter land for preliminary survey or examination, 29 ALR3d 1104.

Traffic noise and vibration from highway as element of damages in eminent domain, 51 ALR3d 860.

Validity and construction of statutes regulating strip mining, 86 ALR3d 27.

Unsightliness of powerline or other wire, or related structure, as element of damages in easement condemnation proceeding, 97 ALR3d 587.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain §§ 3 to 4, 62 to 70, 201 to 212.

§ 1-26-801.
Authority
of state, counties and municipal corporations to acquire by condemnation
proceedings; uranium mill tailings; public purpose.

The state or any county or municipal corporation may purchase or acquire by condemnation any real estate including streets, alleys or public highways, as sites for public buildings or for any other necessary public purpose. Proceedings in condemnation shall be conducted in the name of the state, county or municipal corporation and by the attorney general when for the state, the county attorney when for the county and the municipal attorney when for a municipal corporation.

In carrying out responsibilities under P.L. 95-604, the state may purchase or acquire by condemnation any real estate or radioactive materials if determined necessary to stabilize and control uranium mill tailings in a safe and environmentally sound manner. Proceedings in condemnation shall be as provided by this act.

As used in and for purposes of this section only, “public purpose” means the possession, occupation and enjoyment of the land by a public entity. “Public purpose” shall not include the taking of private property by a public entity for the purpose of transferring the property to another private individual or private entity except in the case of condemnation for the purpose of protecting the public health and safety, in which event the public entity may transfer the condemned property for value to a private individual or entity. However, nothing in this section shall restrict or impair the right or authority of the Wyoming energy authority to transfer property condemned by the authority to another public or private entity insofar as the transfer is consistent with the statutory purposes or duties of the authority.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 4.

If a public entity acquires property in fee simple title under this chapter but fails to make substantial use of the property for a period of ten (10) years, there is a presumption that the property is no longer needed for a public purpose and the previous owner or his successor may apply to the court to request that the property be returned to the previous owner or his successor upon repayment of the amount originally received for the property in the condemnation action. A public entity may rebut the presumption created under this subsection by showing good cause for the delay in using the property.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 1983, ch. 145, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2; 2019 ch. 34, §§ 3, 4, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c) through (d).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 34, § 3, effective July 1, 2020, in (c), substituted “energy” for “pipeline” preceding “authority,” deleted “or the Wyoming infrastructure authority” preceding “to transfer property,” and substituted “the authority.” for “:” at the end.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 34, § 4, effective July 1, 2020, repealed former (c)(i) and (c)(ii), which read: “(i) The Wyoming pipeline authority acting pursuant to W.S.

37-5-102

, as to pipelines as defined in W.S. 37-5-202(a)(iv); or

“(ii) The Wyoming infrastructure authority acting pursuant to W.S.

37-5-303

, as to facilities as defined in W.S. 37-5-302(a)(iii).”

Editor's notes. —

P.L. 95-604, referred to in subsection (b), appears as 42 U.S.C. §§ 2014, 2021, 2022, 2111, 2113, 2114, 2201, 7901, 7911 through 7925, 7941 and 7942.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-26-502(a)(vi).

Cited

in

Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989); L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

For article,
“The More Things Change, The More Things Stay The Same: A Practitioner’s Guide to Recent Changes in Wyoming’s Eminent Domain Act” see
8 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2008).

§ 1-26-802.
Proceedings by water companies and incorporated cities or towns.

Any water company or
incorporated city or town of this state may acquire by purchase, grant
or condemnation any land, real estate, claim, easement or right-of-way
required for or that may be affected by the construction, operation
or maintenance of any waterworks.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

§ 1-26-803.
Municipal streets and alleys; utility mains or pipes; tax levy.

Any incorporated city
or town in Wyoming may use or authorize the use of its streets and
alleys by others, and may obtain by purchase, grant or condemnation
in the manner provided by law all necessary lands for the construction,
laying and operating of mains or pipes for sewers, gas or water for
the use of the cities and towns, and for that purpose to have the
power to levy a tax within the constitutional limits upon all personal
and real property within the corporate limits of the cities and towns.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-804.
Acquisition of public utility plants by cities and towns.

Any incorporated city
or town of this state may acquire by condemnation, purchase or gift
the franchise and the plant, facilities, equipment and property of
any person or entity owning or operating in the city or town a franchise
and plant, facilities, equipment or other property used or intended
for the purpose of supplying or furnishing to the public of the city
or town any public utility service mentioned in W.S.

1-26-805

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-805.
Acquisition of public utility plants by cities and towns; definition
of facilities which may be acquired.

For the purposes of W.S.

1-26-804

through

1-26-809

“public utility service” means and includes communication
or transmission of intelligence or messages by telephone service;
electricity for light, heat, power and like purposes; natural or artificial
gas for heat, light, power and like purposes; steam for heat, power
and like purposes; or water for municipal, domestic, agricultural,
irrigation, manufacturing and like purposes, including surface water
drainage in accordance with W.S.

16-10-103

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 1995, ch. 118, § 2.

§ 1-26-806.
Acquisition of public utility plants by cities and towns; purpose
of acquisition; ownership or operation.

The purpose for which
the franchise and plant, facilities, equipment or other property may
be acquired is for municipal ownership or operation of the business
by the city or town, which right is hereby given to any incorporated
city or town.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-807.
Acquisition of other property for public utility service.

Any incorporated city
or town of this state has the further right to acquire by condemnation,
purchase or gift any real estate or other property, public or private,
whether within or outside the corporate limits of the city or town,
for rights-of-way, sites, buildings or other purposes connected with
or necessary to carry on the business of municipal ownership or operation
of any public utility service, or to secure outside connections for
any public utility service.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-808.
Election in cities and towns on question of acquisition.

No city or town shall
acquire the franchise or the plant, facilities, equipment or other
property of any person or entity for the purpose of supplying or furnishing
to the public of the city or town any public utility service unless
authorized at an election. The election shall be held as provided
by law for the submission of a bond issue under the Political Subdivision
Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 1-26-809.
Determination of value of franchise to be acquired.

In determining the value
of the franchise, consideration shall be given to the total amount
paid for the franchise for the entire term of the franchise and deductions
made proportioned on the unexpired term of the franchise.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-810.
Powers of railroad companies relative to condemnation generally.

Any railroad company organized under the laws of this state, the laws of the United States or which has been duly organized under the laws of any other state and has filed copies of its articles of incorporation with the secretary of state in this state as required by law is authorized to:

Exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire rights-of-way for railroad tracks and easements for offices, depots and other appurtenant facilities related directly to the operation of the railroad;

Take, hold and appropriate a right-of-way over adjacent lands sufficient to enable the corporation to construct and repair its road upon the line of its location or relocation thereof; and

Acquire a right to conduct water by aqueducts and to make appropriate drains.

Any land taken, appropriated and held otherwise than by the consent of the owner shall not exceed two hundred (200) feet in width unless greater width is necessary for excavations, embankments, depositing waste earth or for construction of other appurtenant facilities necessary for the operation of the railroad.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Width limitation. —

Condemnation of a 50-foot tract of land, when combined with the width of land involved in a settlement agreement between a railroad and the property owners, did not violate the 200-foot limit on railroad condemnation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-810(b). The 50-foot tract was needed for slope support for a railroad track and was therefore necessary for the operation of the railroad.
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Ry. Co. v. A 50-foot Wide Easement Consisting of 6.99 Acres More Or Less, 346 Fed. Appx. 297,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 19997

(10th Cir. 2009).

Cited in

Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

§ 1-26-811.
Crossing public highways; privileges and duties.

A railroad company may raise or lower any county road or other public highway for the purpose of having its railroad pass over or under the road or highway. Repair or reconstruction of roads or highways shall be expeditiously completed.

While engaged in raising or lowering any county road or other public highway or in making any other alteration which may obstruct the public way, a railroad company shall provide and maintain suitable temporary ways to enable travelers to avoid or pass obstructions.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-812.
Constructing, maintaining, abandoning or closing crossings.

When any person owns land on both sides of any railroad, the company owning the railroad shall construct and maintain reasonably adequate means of crossing the railroad.

No railroad shall abandon, close or fail to maintain any public highway crossing unless in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

37-10-102

.

No railroad shall abandon, close or fail to maintain any other existing crossing which has been maintained or recognized by the railroad for more than five (5) years prior to the effective date of this act without:

Providing written notice of its intended action to every person owning lands adjacent to the crossing;

Advertising its intended action in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the crossing; and

No sooner than three (3) weeks after providing the notice required, holding a meeting open to all persons at which it shall explain and at which persons shall be permitted to express their views on the intended action.

Any railroad violating subsection (c) of this section shall not be entitled to assert any of the powers provided by W.S.

1-26-810

over any lands which are part of or are adjacent to the crossing, until the railroad has reconstructed the crossing abandoned, closed or not maintained in violation of subsection (c) of this section.

In any action involving the abandonment, closing or maintenance of a railroad crossing which has been maintained or recognized by the railroad for more than five (5) years prior to the effective date of this act, the railroad shall not be entitled to assert any of the powers provided by W.S.

1-26-810

over any lands which are part of or are adjacent to the crossing unless the railroad establishes by a preponderance of the evidence:

The closing or abandonment of the crossing is justified by either financial or safety considerations;

There exists reasonable alternative means of access to all property served by the crossing; and

That it has complied with the provisions of this section and the Wyoming Eminent Domain Act.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or prohibiting any person from maintaining any other action at law for a railroad’s failure to maintain a crossing, or abandonment or closing of a crossing.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 1991, ch. 118, § 1.

Right to jury trial. —

Fed. R. Civ. P. 71.1(k) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-812(f) did not provide property owners with a right to a jury trial in a condemnation suit brought by a railroad. Section 1-26-812(f) merely confirmed that the statute did not affect other potential actions at law for a railroad's failure to maintain a crossing and did not itself provide a right to trial by jury.
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Ry. Co. v. A 50-foot Wide Easement Consisting of 6.99 Acres More Or Less, 346 Fed. Appx. 297,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 19997

(10th Cir. 2009).

Wyoming Eminent Domain Act. —

See §§

1-26-501

and 1-26-502(a)(vi).

§ 1-26-813.
Right-of-way along public ways granted; permission necessary for new lines.

Persons authorized to do business in this state for the purpose of constructing, maintaining and operating a public utility or communications company may set their fixtures and facilities along, across or under any of the public roads, streets and waters of this state in such manner as not to inconvenience the public in their use. Any public utility or communications company desiring to install its facilities in any city shall first attempt to obtain consent from the city council in accordance with applicable law. A person shall first obtain permission from the state transportation commission or the board of county commissioners in the county where the construction is contemplated before entering upon any state highway or county road for the purpose of commencing the construction. An application for all construction permits, licenses and authorizations to construct broadband facilities on government property or public rights-of-way shall be submitted to the appropriate governing entity as the applicable governing entity may require. Upon receiving an application as required in this subsection, any necessary permits, licenses or authorizations shall receive a response, be approved or be denied by the city, department of transportation or the county. Unless a different period is stipulated to by the parties, the city, department of transportation or the county shall respond to the application, approve or deny all necessary permits, authorizations and licenses not later than sixty (60) calendar days after receipt of the application.

As used in this section, “communications company” means a person, or any agent, contractor or subcontractor of the person, who in the course of business, provides services which are telecommunications services, as defined in W.S. 37-15-103(a)(xii), internet protocol enabled service or voice over internet protocol. For purposes of this section only, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, a communications company includes a cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C § 522(5), provided the cable operator provides any of the services listed in this subsection. As used in this section:

“Internet protocol enabled service” means any service, capability, functionality or application, other than voice over internet protocol service, using existing internet protocol, or any successor internet protocol, that enables an end user to send or receive a communication in existing internet protocol format, or any successor internet protocol format, utilizing a broadband connection at the end user’s location, regardless of whether the communication is voice, data or video;

“Voice over internet protocol service” means any service that:

Enables real time, two-way voice communication originating from or terminating at the user’s location in internet protocol or a successor protocol;

Utilizes a broadband connection at the user’s location; and

Permits a user to receive a call that originates on the public switched telephone network and to terminate a call to the public switched telephone network.

Nothing in this section shall:

Authorize communications companies to set or install permanent towers along, across or under any of the public roads, streets and waters of this state or to set communication poles in a state managed right-of-way;

Be construed to prohibit a city, town or county from requiring a franchise before issuing any permits, licenses or authorizations as provided by this section.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2019 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 45, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and added "or communications company" following "public utility" twice, and "in accordance with applicable law" following "city council"; and added (b).

The 2021 amendment,

in (a), substituted "Persons" for "Corporations" at the beginning, added the third through sixth sentence; added the second sentence in (b); and added (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 45, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Judgment is proper when county acts within its rights. —

Judgment on the pleadings in favor of the county was proper because the county was within its rights to enter into a public road right-of-way use agreement with a private utility company, which would allow the utility to build a proposed sewer line, because the agreement was in public's interest, it fit within scope of the easement granted by servient estates and did not increase their burden. A public road easement could be used for an underground sewer line and such right was not defeated solely because the sewer line was to be constructed by a private entity. Box L Corp. v. Teton County, 2004 WY 75, 92 P.3d 811,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2004).

Facilities subject to common-law relocation requirements. —

Public utility facilities such as power poles are located in the public way only by authority of licenses issued pursuant to this section and its earlier codifications. Any facilities licensed under statute are subject to the relocation requirements of the common law, regardless of what the license may say, or not say, concerning this subject. Only the legislature may shift the burden of relocation expenses to the state. State Highway Comm'n v. Sheridan-Johnson Rural Electrification Ass'n, 784 P.2d 588,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1989).

Section does not grant board of county commissioners authority to regulate public utilities. —

Vandehei Developers v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 790 P.2d 1282,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Schott v. Miller, 943 P.2d 1174,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

State v. Homar, 798 P.2d 824,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Placement, maintenance or design of standing utility pole as affecting private utility's liability for personal injury resulting from vehicle's collision with pole within or beside highway, 51 ALR4th 602.

§ 1-26-814.
Right of eminent domain granted; petroleum or other pipeline companies;
purposes.

Whenever any utility
or any petroleum or other pipeline company, authorized to do business
in this state, has not acquired by gift or purchase any land, real
estate or claim required for the construction, maintenance and operation
of their facilities and appurtenances or which may be affected by
any operation connected with the construction or maintenance of the
same, the utility or company has the right of eminent domain and may
condemn the easement required by the utility or company.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Condemnor must show landlocked mineral ownership.—

Comparable easements may be used to find fair market value
of condemned easement

Condemnor must show landlocked mineral ownership.—

Because an oil and gas company did not show mineral ownership that would qualify it as a condemnor, it should not have been permitted access to owners’ property; the legislature intended that only those entities with landlocked mineral ownership would have the power to condemn under the Eminent Domain Act. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Comparable easements may be used to find fair market value
of condemned easement

District court could consider evidence of comparable easements in determining just compensation for pipeline easements condemned by a carbon dioxide pipeline developer, but erroneously rejected some comparable easements on the basis that they were not the result of arms' length transactions or that they related to a natural gas pipeline. Further, annual payments were allowed as compensation.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. R-13).

Cited in

Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

§ 1-26-815.
Right of eminent domain granted; ways of necessity for authorized
businesses; purposes; extent.

Any person, association, company or corporation authorized to do business in this state may appropriate by condemnation a way of necessity over, across or on so much of the lands or real property of others as necessary for the location, construction, maintenance and use of reservoirs, drains, flumes, ditches including return flow and wastewater ditches, underground water pipelines, pumping stations and other necessary appurtenances, canals, electric power transmission lines and distribution systems, railroad trackage, sidings, spur tracks, tramways, roads or mine truck haul roads required in the course of their business for agricultural, mining, exploration drilling and production of oil and gas, milling, electric power transmission and distribution, domestic, municipal or sanitary purposes, or for the transportation of coal from any coal mine or railroad line or for the transportation of oil and gas from any well.

The right of condemnation may be exercised for the purpose of:

Acquiring, enlarging or relocating ways of necessity; and

Acquiring easements or rights-of-way over adjacent lands sufficient to enable the owner of the way of necessity to construct, repair, maintain and use the structures, roads or facilities for which the way of necessity is acquired.

A way of necessity acquired hereunder shall not exceed one hundred (100) feet in width on each side of the outer sides or marginal lines of the reservoir, drain, ditch, underground water pipeline, canal, flume, power transmission line or distribution system, railroad trackage, siding or tramway unless a greater width is necessary for excavation, embankment or deposit of waste from excavation. In no case may the area appropriated exceed that actually necessary for the purpose of use for which a way of necessity is authorized.

No person qualified to exercise the condemnation authority granted by this section, except a public utility that has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to W.S.

37-2-205

, shall exercise the authority for the erection, placement or expansion of collector systems associated with commercial facilities generating electricity from wind. The prohibition imposed by this subsection shall be effective immediately and shall end June 30, 2015 or upon the effective date of legislation establishing additional conditions for the use of condemnation authority for the erection, placement or expansion of collector systems associated with commercial facilities generating electricity from wind, whichever occurs earlier. As used in this subsection, “collector systems associated with commercial facilities generating electricity from wind” means the conductor infrastructure, including conductors, towers, substations, switchgear and other components necessary to deliver power from any commercial facility generating electricity from wind up to but not including electric substations or interconnections facilities associated with existing or proposed transmission lines that serve load or that export energy from Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 161, § 1; 2010, ch. 48, § 1; 2011, ch. 86, § 1; 2013 ch. 34, § 1, effective February 14, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2010, ch. 48, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

in (d), substituted “2013” for “2011.”

Laws 2011, ch. 86 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

in (d), substituted “2015” for “2013”.

Laws 2013, ch. 34, section 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, section 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

Certificate of convenience and necessity not required from
non-public utility company. —

In a condemnation case under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 32 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-815

, by a power company, a certificate of convenience and necessity under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

37-2-205

and

1-26-816

was not required because the company was not a ‘public utility’ as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann § 37-1-101(a)(vi) in that the company supplied wholesale power to an energy corporation that in turn sold it to its members. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

Owner of servient estate not surface owner for purposes of
mining application. —

After condemnation of a way of necessity for a railroad spur track and a mine truck haul road, the owner of a servient estate is not a surface owner for purposes of the mining permit application statute and, therefore, his consent, or an order in lieu thereof, need not be included in the mining permit application. WYMO Fuels v. Edwards, 723 P.2d 1230,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 601

(Wyo. 1986).

Condemnor must show landlocked mineral ownership. —

Because an oil and gas company did not show mineral ownership that would qualify it as a condemnor, it should not have been permitted access to owners’ property; the legislature intended that only those entities with landlocked mineral ownership would have the power to condemn under the Eminent Domain Act. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited in

Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Use of Opinion Testimony for Valuing Real Property in an Eminent Domain Suit,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 43 (1984).

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
86.04, 100.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-26-816.
Condemnation and certificate of public necessity and convenience.

No person shall institute
a condemnation proceeding relating to any facility for which a certificate
of public necessity and convenience is required until the certificate
has been issued.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

§ 1-26-817.
Reservation of right to establish crossings.

Any condemnation order
entered shall in all cases reserve to the owner or occupant of any
real property through, over or across which any right-of-way is acquired
the right to establish suitable crossings connecting his or their
lands on either side of the right-of-way, at any point or points which
may be selected by the owner or occupant. The ditch, canal, drain,
flume or other irrigation works shall be protected at the crossings
by the construction and maintenance of a suitable bridge or viaduct
at the expense of the owner or occupant.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Cited in

Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).